Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.951

Retired or disabled employees of employer groups—Return following termination of employer's agreement—2023 c 312.

Any retired or disabled employee whose participation in insurance plans or contracts under RCW 41.05.080(1)(a)(i) ended due to the termination of the contractual agreement between the authority and an employer group on or before January 1, 2023, must be allowed to return and participate in insurance plans and contracts as described in RCW 41.05.080(1)(a)(ii) so long as the retired or disabled employee notifies the health care authority in writing by December 31, 2023, after which participation will begin on the first day of the month following the date the authority receives the retired or disabled employee's written notice.

[ 2023 c 312 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 312: See note following RCW 41.05.083.